Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 32A. SPEEDY TRIAL

Art. 32A.01. TRIAL PRIORITIES. (a) Insofar as is practicable, the trial of a criminal action shall be given preference over trials of civil cases, and the trial of a criminal action against a defendant who is detained in jail pending trial of the action shall be given preference over trials of other criminal actions not described by Subsection (b) or (c).

(b) Unless extraordinary circumstances require otherwise, the trial of a criminal action in which the alleged victim is younger than 14 years of age shall be given preference over other matters before the court, whether civil or criminal.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the trial of a criminal action against a defendant who has been determined to be restored to competency under Article 46B.084 shall be given preference over other matters before the court, whether civil or criminal.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1970, ch. 787, Sec. 1, eff. July 1, 1978.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1251 (H.B. 1396), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 748 (S.B. 1326), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.